Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-904
Members; duties.

Each
commissioner shall attend the meeting of the National Conference of Commissioners
on Uniform State Laws, and both in and out of such national conference shall
do all in his or her power to promote uniformity in state laws, upon all subjects
where uniformity may be deemed desirable and practicable. The commission shall
report electronically to
the Clerk of the Legislature from time to time as the commission may deem
proper, an account of its transactions, and its advice and recommendations
for legislation. Each member of the Legislature shall receive an
electronic copy of such report by making a request for it to the
chairperson of the commission. It shall also be the duty of the commission
to bring about as far as practicable the uniform judicial interpretation of
all uniform laws.

Laws 1951, c. 166, § 4, p. 650;

Laws 1979, LB 322, § 20;

Laws 1981, LB 545, § 12;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 69.